Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-196
Counties; boundary changes; how effected.

Whenever the county boards of adjoining counties shall desire to submit a proposal for change of the boundaries between such counties, the boards may by resolution entered on their records provide a joint survey and maps of the existing and proposed boundaries. At the next general election thereafter each of said county boards shall submit the question of the proposed change in boundaries to the qualified voters at such election.

Laws 1921, c. 231, § 12, p. 828;

C.S.1922, § 814;

C.S.1929, § 25-1,101;

R.S.1943, § 22-196.